chv.twol
Alphabet
  а ӑ е ё ӗ и о у ӳ ы э ю я б в г д ж з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ й ь ъ
  А Ӑ Е Ё Ӗ И О У Ӳ Ы Э Ю Я Б В Г Д Ж З К Л М Н П Р С Ҫ Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Й Ь Ъ 
 %{A%}:а %{A%}:е
 %{AA%}:ӑ %{AA%}:ӗ %{AA%}:0
 %{м%}:м %{м%}:0
 %{Y%}:у %{Y%}:ӳ
 %{Т%}:т %{Т%}:ч
 а:0
;

Sets 

BackVow = ӑ а ы о у я ё ю ;

FrontVow = ӗ э и е ӳ ;

Cns = б в г д ж з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ й ь ъ ;

ArchiCns = %{м%} ;

Rules

"Back vowel harmony for archiphoneme {A}"
%{A%}:а <=> [BackVow: | %{AA%}:ӑ | %{Y%}:у ] [ Cns: | %>: ]+ _ ;

"Back vowel harmony for archiphoneme {Y}"
%{Y%}:у <=> [BackVow: | %{A%}:а | %{Y%}:у ] [ Cns: | %>: ]+ _ ;

"Back vowel harmony for archiphoneme {AA}"
%{AA%}:ӑ <=> [BackVow: | %{AA%}:ӑ | %{A%}:а ] [ ArchiCns: | Cns: | %>: ]+ _ ;
        except
                                     %{м%}: %>:  _ н ;
                                     [ BackVow: | FrontVow: ] %>:  _ ;

"Non surface {AA} in plural genitive"
%{AA%}:0 <=> %{м%}: %>: _ н ;

"Non surface {AA} after vowels in genitive"
%{AA%}:0 <=> [ BackVow: | FrontVow: | %{Y%}: ] %>: _ ;

"Non surface а vowels before {Y}? "
а:0 <=> _ %>: %{Y%}: ;

"Non surface {м} before н in genitive"
%{м%}:0 <=> е:е _ %>: %{AA%}:0 н ;

"The rule for че after сен"
%{Т%}:т <=> %{м%}: %>: _ ;

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;
